Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.193

Dates upon which retirement allowances accrue.

Retirement allowances paid to members eligible to retire under the provisions of RCW 41.40.180, 41.40.200, 41.40.210, 41.40.220, 41.40.230, and 41.40.250 shall accrue from the first day of the calendar month immediately following the calendar month during which the member is separated from service. Retirement allowance paid to members eligible to retire under any other provisions of *this 1972 amendatory act shall accrue from the first day of a calendar month but in no event earlier than the first day of the calendar month immediately following the calendar month during which the member is separated from service.

[ 1983 c 3 s 94; 1973 1st ex.s. c 190 s 10; 1972 ex.s. c 151 s 7.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: For codification of "this 1972 amendatory act" [1972 ex.s. c 151], see Codification Tables.

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 190: See note following RCW 41.40.010.